Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.070

Qualifications of applicants—Law enforcement agencies.

An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter, must be a citizen of the United States of America, a lawful permanent resident, or a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient. An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter must be able to speak, read, and write the English language.

An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service must be of an age suitable for the position applied for, in ordinary good health, of good moral character and of temperate and industrious habits; these facts to be ascertained in such manner as the commission may deem advisable.

An application for a position with a law enforcement agency may be rejected if the law enforcement agency deems that it does not have the resources to conduct the background investigation required pursuant to chapter 43.101 RCW. Resources means materials, funding, and staff time. Nothing in this section impairs an applicant's rights under state antidiscrimination laws.

[ 2024 c 330 s 6; 2018 c 32 s 2; 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 3; 1963 c 95 s 2; 1937 c 13 s 7; RRS s 9558a-7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1972 ex.s. c 37: See note following RCW 41.08.070.